Idaho, session 2025, H0084.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-5767, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-5767. DIRECTOR MAY PROVIDE SERVICE TO SCHOOL DISTRICTS, PUBLIC
COMMUNITY COLLEGES, PUBLIC COLLEGES, PUBLIC UNIVERSITIES, CITIES, OR OTHER
POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS. (1) Under terms and procedures mutually agreed upon
on by contract, the director of the department of administration may render
the same services with respect to personnel of any school district, public
community college, public college, public university, city, or other po-
litical subdivision of the state of Idaho. The cost of any group insurance,
group annuity, or health care service coverage so provided and of admin-
istration thereof shall be borne by the school district, public community
college, public college, public university, city, or other political subdi-
vision.
(2) Other political subdivision for the purpose of this section means
any organization composed of units of government of Idaho or organizations
funded only by government or government employee contributions or organiza-
tions who discharge governmental responsibilities that would otherwise be
performed by government.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.